Illinois, session 104th, HB4258.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Emerging Adult Sentencing Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to create a 7transformative post-conviction model that reduces reliance on 8traditional incarceration for emerging adults by fostering 9partnerships between adult probation departments and 10nonprofit, community-based residential workforce development 11centers to implement restorative justice practices, workforce 12training, and mental health support. This Act recognizes that 13young adults aged 18 through 25 are more likely to be justice 14involved due to poverty, instability, trauma, and a lack of 15social and emotional services and support. Young adults who 16receive holistic, developmentally appropriate supports and 17services in a community setting continue educational pursuits, 18successfully enter the workforce, and are less likely to 19reoffend, thus increasing the welfare of the young adult and 20the community, rather than those who are incarcerated. This 21Act recognizes that the qualities that distinguish juveniles 22from adults do not disappear when an individual turns 18. They 23remain vulnerable to negative influences and outside peer   HB4258- 2 -LRB104 16940 RLC 30354 b1pressures, including from their families and peers, and they 2have limited control over their own environment. Because the 3characters of emerging adults are still being formed, their 4traits are less fixed and their actions are less likely to be 5evidence of a lack of rehabilitative potential. Accordingly, 6emerging adults are worthy of special care, investment, and 7consideration so as to prevent long-term involvement in the 8criminal justice system and the psychological damage caused by 9carceral settings. This policy is grounded in balanced 10restorative justice values and practices, that seek to improve 11community safety by considering the welfare of the emerging 12adult with a focus on connecting emerging adults to supports 13that address underlying root causes of behavior instead of 14punitive measures. 15    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:16    "Emerging adult" means an individual who is at least 18 17years of age but under 26 years of age, at the time of the 18commission of the offense, who has been convicted of a crime 19that is non-probationable and is eligible for confinement in a 20penal institution. 21    "Individualized service plan" means the written details of 22the developmentally appropriate supports, activities, and 23resources required for the individual to achieve personal 24goals, which could include workforce development, mental 25health counseling, substance abuse counseling, educational   HB4258- 3 -LRB104 16940 RLC 30354 b1classes, financial literacy classes, and restorative justice 2programming that a defendant will receive during the term of 3the person's stay.4    "Initial assessment" means a detailed evaluation of a 5person's behavioral health used to diagnose conditions, 6identify strengths and needs, and develop treatment plans such 7as provided through the use of standardized assessment tools 8such as the Illinois Medicaid Comprehensive Assessment of 9Needs and Strengths.10    "Mitigation report" means a report that outlines the 11social and educational history of a person, which also 12includes employment history, mental health diagnosis and 13individualized service plans, history of or current substance 14use and treatment, criminal history, and character references.15    "Penal institution" has the meaning ascribed to the term 16in Section 2-14 of the Criminal Code of 2012.17    "Residential workforce development center" means a 18nonprofit organization that provides transitional housing and 19on-site facilitation of workforce development services 20including employment and vocational training, financial 21counseling, education, social and mental health services, 22substance abuse counseling, individual and family counseling, 23restorative justice programming, assistance in locating 24permanent residential placement and obtaining suitable 25employment or educational pursuits upon release, and any other 26services as appropriate to emerging adults.   HB4258- 4 -LRB104 16940 RLC 30354 b1    "Restorative justice programming" means practices or 2programming designed to contribute to the emotional 3development of a defendant and foster meaningful connections 4to the community.5    "Transitional housing" means single occupancy housing in a 6facility not otherwise open to and accessible by the public 7that is equipped with video monitoring, residential managers, 824-hour on-site staffing and monitoring, visitation 9restrictions, and a curfew; and that provides residents with 10on-site meals, laundry services, basic living necessities 11including personal care items, and health and wellness 12facilities and services. 13    Section 15. Establishment of emerging adult sentencing. 14    (a) Community-based residential workforce development 15centers shall offer transitional housing and developmentally 16appropriate services including, but not limited to, workforce 17training and certification, mental health counseling, 18financial literacy classes, and restorative justice 19programming in alignment with State guidelines, and shall have 20and maintain the appropriate certifications, licenses, and 21accreditations for all provided services, which shall be 22provided to the adult probation department and included in the 23mitigation packet submitted to the court.24    (b) The program shall be subject to judicial discretion, 25allowing sentencing judges to assign eligible individuals to   HB4258- 5 -LRB104 16940 RLC 30354 b1community-based residential workforce development centers 2while on a period of probation in lieu of a period of 3incarceration at the Department of Corrections.4    (c) Community-based residential workforce development 5centers shall provide annual reports to the adult probation 6department detailing aggregate performance and impact metrics. 7    Section 20. Eligible persons. 8    (a) Notwithstanding the provisions set forth in Section 95-5-3 of the Unified Code of Corrections, this Act applies to 10persons ages 18 through 25 at the time of the commission of the 11offense who are convicted of the following felony offenses in 12which a period of incarceration must be imposed, other than a 13sentence of natural life: 14        (1) any non-violent felony offense in which a period 15    of incarceration must be imposed upon conviction; 16        (2) aggravated unlawful possession of a weapon;17        (3) unlawful possession of weapons by felons;18        (4) residential burglary; 19        (5) probationable felony offenses in which a period of 20    incarceration other than natural life must be imposed upon 21    conviction based upon the criminal history of the 22    defendant, except sex offenses as defined in Section 2 of 23    the Sex Offender Registration Act; and24        (6) any felony offense in which the court finds 25    exceptional circumstances exist for purposes of sentencing   HB4258- 6 -LRB104 16940 RLC 30354 b1    under this Act, except for first degree murder and sex 2    offenses as defined in Section 2 of the Sex Offender 3    Registration Act.4    (b) Prior criminal history shall not preclude eligibility 5for sentencing under this Act. 6    Section 25. Sentencing. 7    (a) Upon a conviction by way of plea or otherwise finding 8of guilt, and with the express agreement of the State's 9Attorney and the defendant, the court may sentence a defendant 10who meets the eligibility requirements under this Act to a 11term of probation to be performed at a community-based 12residential workforce development center for a period of not 13less than one year and not more than 3 years in lieu of 14incarceration in the Illinois Department of Corrections. The 15defendant shall be monitored by the adult probation 16department. The conditions of probation are that the 17defendant: 18        (1) not violate any criminal statute of this State or 19    any other jurisdiction; 20        (2) refrain from possessing a firearm or any other 21    dangerous weapon; and22        (3) attend and participate in any program activities 23    as detailed in the individualized service plan.24    All fines, fees, and costs shall be waived for any 25defendant sentenced to a community-based residential workforce   HB4258- 7 -LRB104 16940 RLC 30354 b1development center under this Act. 2    (b) Prior to imposing a sentence of probation under this 3Act, the defendant shall submit a mitigation report to the 4court and the court may, upon its own order, also obtain a 5Presentence Investigation Report. The defendant must also 6obtain and provide proof of acceptance to a community-based 7workforce development center and submit an individualized 8service plan to the court based upon an initial assessment 9provided by a licensed professional. 10    (c) In determining whether to impose a sentence under this 11Act, the court shall take into consideration the following: 12        (1) the age, immaturity, or limited mental capacity of 13    the defendant; 14        (2) the nature and circumstances of the offense; 15        (3) whether sentencing under this Act is in the 16    interest of the defendant's rehabilitation, including any 17    employment or involvement in community, educational, 18    training, or vocational programs as detailed in the 19    individualized service plan; 20        (4) whether the defendant suffers from trauma, as 21    supported by documentation or evaluation by a licensed 22    professional; and 23        (5) the potential risk to public safety. 24    (d) The court shall make a detailed record of its findings 25when imposing or declining to impose sentencing under this Act 26for any eligible persons.   HB4258- 8 -LRB104 16940 RLC 30354 b1    (e) Upon successful fulfillment of the terms and 2conditions of probation, the court shall discharge the 3defendant from probation. If the person's sentence has not 4been vacated under this Section, upon motion, the court shall 5vacate the judgment of conviction and dismiss the criminal 6proceedings against him or her unless, having considered the 7nature and circumstances of the offense and the history, 8character, and condition of the individual, the court finds 9that the motion should not be granted. Unless good cause is 10shown, the motion to vacate must be filed at any time from the 11date of entry of the judgment to a date that is not more than 1260 days after the discharge from probation. 13    Section 30. Progress reports. The adult probation 14department shall submit a written status report to the court, 15to the State, and to the defense, detailing the progress of the 16defendant: 17        (1) 90 days after initial sentencing; 18        (2) upon completion of the probation period or the 19    fulfillment of the terms of the individualized service 20    plan; or21        (3) any time upon request of the court. 22    Section 35. Violation, modification, and revocation of 23probation. 24    (a) Upon violation of a term or condition of the program,   HB4258- 9 -LRB104 16940 RLC 30354 b1the court may enter a judgment on its original finding of guilt 2and proceed as otherwise provided by law. 3    (b) The court shall consider least restrictive 4alternatives prior to imposing a sentence of incarceration 5upon a revocation of the sentence of probation. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.